src/fst/affixes/irregularverbs.lexc
LEXICON AQOON/GenPresAlt
      +1Sg+Sty/TODO:aqaannaa            Clitics ;
     +2Sg+Sty/TODO:taqaannaa            Clitics ;
    +3SgM+Sty/TODO:yaqaannaa            Clitics ;
    +3SgF+Sty/TODO:taqaannaa            Clitics ;
     +1Pl+Sty/TODO:naqaannaa            Clitics ;
    +2Pl+Sty/TODO:taqaanniin            Clitics ;
    +3Pl+Sty/TODO:yaqaanniin            Clitics ;

LEXICON AQOON/GenPresRedAbsAlt
      +1Sg+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:aqaanna´            Clitics ;   !  aqaanna´
     +2Sg+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:yaqaanna´            Clitics ;   ! yaqaanna´
    +3SgM+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:yaqaanna´            Clitics ;   ! yaqaanna´
    +3SgF+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:taqaanna´            Clitics ;   ! taqaanna´
     +1Pl+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:naqaanna´            Clitics ;   ! naqaanna´
    +2Pl+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:yaqaanna´         Clitics ;   ! yaqaanna´
    +3Pl+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:yaqaanna´         Clitics ;   ! yaqaanna´

LEXICON AQOON/Imp
    +Sg:oqo´ow      Clitics ;       ! oqo´ow
    +Pl:oqoo´da     Clitics ;       ! oqoo´da

    +Neg+Sg:o´qoon  Clitics ;       ! o´qoon
    +Neg+Sg:o´qoonin    Clitics ;       ! o´qoonin
    +Neg+Pl:o´qoonina Clitics ;     ! oqooni´na



LEXICON IMAN
    +Inf:ima´n  Clitics ; ! ima´n
    +Ind+Past:  IMAN/GenPast ;
    +Ind+Past:  IMAN/GenPastRedAbs ; ! +Red tag after
    +Ind+Past:  IMAN/GenPastRedNom ; ! +Red tag after
    +Neg+Past:  IMAN/GenPastNeg ;

    +Ind+Pres:  IMAN/GenPres ;
    +Ind+Pres:  IMAN/GenPresRel ;
    +Ind+Pres:  IMAN/GenPresRedAbs ; ! +Red tag after
    +Ind+Pres:  IMAN/GenPresRedNom ;

    +Neg+Pres:  IMAN/GenPresNeg ;

    +Imp:       IMAN/Imp ;

    ! Barrier and  necessary for Prog.
    :iman%>     Progressive ; ! ima´n ; TODO: +Ind tag comes in at some odd place.
    +Neg+Prog+Pres:iman             Clitics ;       ! ima´n
    +Neg+Prog+Past:imanayn      Clitics ;   ! ima´nay´n
    +Neg+Prog+Past:imanaynin        Clitics ;   ! ima´nayni´n


! Following lexicons only have Person, Reduced and Sty tags.
LEXICON IMAN/GenPast
      +1Sg:imi´             Clitics ;
     +2Sg:timi´             Clitics ;
    +3SgM:yimi´             Clitics ;
    +3SgF:timi´             Clitics ;
     +1Pl:nimi´             Clitics ;
    +2Pl:timiddeen      Clitics/NG ;
    +3Pl:yimiddeen      Clitics/NG ;
    +2Pl:timaaddeen     Clitics ;
    +3Pl:yimaaddeen     Clitics ;

    ! NOTE: NG forms without geminate
    +2Pl:timaadeen      Clitics/NG ;
    +3Pl:yimaadeen      Clitics/NG ;

    +2Pl:timideen       Clitics/NG ;
    +3Pl:yimideen       Clitics/NG ;

    ! TODO: some of these may be reduced or relative
      +1Sg+Sty/D:imid´              Clitics ;
     +2Sg+Sty/D:timid´              Clitics ;
    +3SgM+Sty/D:yimid´              Clitics ;
    +3SgF+Sty/D:timid´              Clitics ;
     +1Pl+Sty/D:nimid´              Clitics ;

      +1Sg+Sty/TODO:imiday              Clitics ;
     +2Sg+Sty/TODO:timiday              Clitics ;
    +3SgM+Sty/TODO:yimiday              Clitics ;
    +3SgF+Sty/TODO:timiday              Clitics ;
     +1Pl+Sty/TODO:nimidnay             Clitics ;

      +1Sg+Sty/TODO:imaaday             Clitics ;
     +2Sg+Sty/TODO:timaaday             Clitics ;
    +3SgM+Sty/TODO:yimaaday             Clitics ;
    +3SgF+Sty/TODO:timaaday             Clitics ;
     +1Pl+Sty/TODO:nimaadnay                Clitics ;


! TODO: Check these-- kind of guessing
LEXICON IMAN/GenPastRedNom
      +1Sg+Red+Abs:imaadday         IMAN/ALT ;
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:yimaadday         IMAN/ALT ;
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:yimaadday         IMAN/ALT ;
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:timaadday         IMAN/ALT ;
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:nimaadnay         IMAN/ALT ;
    +2Pl+Red+Abs:yimaadday          IMAN/ALT ;
    +3Pl+Red+Abs:yimaadday          IMAN/ALT ;

      +1Sg+Red+Abs:imaaday          IMAN/ALT ;
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:yimaaday          IMAN/ALT ;
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:yimaaday          IMAN/ALT ;
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:timaaday          IMAN/ALT ;
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:nimaadnay         IMAN/ALT ;
    +2Pl+Red+Abs:yimaaday           IMAN/ALT ;
    +3Pl+Red+Abs:yimaaday           IMAN/ALT ;


! NOTE: following lexicon adds final tone and -d alternative
LEXICON IMAN/GenPastRedAbs
      +1Sg+Red+Abs:imi          IMAN/ALT ; !     imi´   /    imi´d
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:yimi          IMAN/ALT ; !    yimi´   /   yimi´d
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:yimi          IMAN/ALT ; !    yimi´   /   yimi´d
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:timi          IMAN/ALT ; !    timi´   /   timi´d
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:nimi          IMAN/ALT ; !    nimi´   /   nimi´d
    +2Pl+Red+Abs:yimi           IMAN/ALT ; !    yimi´   /   yimi´d
    +3Pl+Red+Abs:yimi           IMAN/ALT ; !    yimi´   /   yimi´d

!     +1Sg+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:imiday          IMAN/ALT ; !     imi´   /    imi´d
!    +2Sg+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:yimiday          IMAN/ALT ; !    yimi´   /   yimi´d
!   +3SgM+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:yimiday          IMAN/ALT ; !    yimi´   /   yimi´d
!   +3SgF+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:timiday          IMAN/ALT ; !    timi´   /   timi´d
!    +1Pl+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:nimidnay         IMAN/ALT ; !    nimi´   /   nimi´d
!   +2Pl+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:yimiday           IMAN/ALT ; !    yimi´   /   yimi´d
!   +3Pl+Red+Abs+Sty/TODO:yimiday           IMAN/ALT ; !    yimi´   /   yimi´d


LEXICON IMAN/GenPastNeg
    +Sg:iman               Clitics ; ! ima´n
    +Pl:imanin             Clitics ; ! imani´n

LEXICON IMAN/GenPres
      +1Sg:imaaddaa         Clitics ;
     +2Sg:timaaddaa         Clitics ;
    +3SgM:yimaaddaa         Clitics ;
    +3SgF:timaaddaa         Clitics ;
     +1Pl:nimaadnaa         Clitics ;
    +2Pl:timaaddaan     Clitics ;
    +3Pl:yimaaddaan     Clitics ;

    ! NOTE: NG forms without geminate
      +1Sg:imaadaa          Clitics/NG ;
     +2Sg:timaadaa          Clitics/NG ;
    +3SgM:yimaadaa          Clitics/NG ;
    +3SgF:timaadaa          Clitics/NG ;
     +1Pl:nimaadnaa         Clitics/NG ;
    +2Pl:timaadaan      Clitics/NG ;
    +3Pl:yimaadaan      Clitics/NG ;


LEXICON IMAN/GenPresRedNom
      +1Sg+Red+Nom:imaaddaa         Clitics ;   !    imaaddaa
     +2Sg+Red+Nom:yimaaddaa         Clitics ;   !   yimaaddaa
    +3SgM+Red+Nom:yimaaddaa         Clitics ;   !   yimaaddaa
    +3SgF+Red+Nom:timaaddaa         Clitics ;   !   timaaddaa
     +1Pl+Red+Nom:nimaaddaa         Clitics ;   !   nimaadnaa
    +2Pl+Red+Nom:yimaaddaa          Clitics ;   !   yimaaddaa
    +3Pl+Red+Nom:yimaaddaa          Clitics ;   !   yimaaddaa

    ! NOTE: NG forms without geminate
      +1Sg+Red+Nom:imaadaa          Clitics/NG ;    !    imaadaa
     +2Sg+Red+Nom:yimaadaa          Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaadaa
    +3SgM+Red+Nom:yimaadaa          Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaadaa
    +3SgF+Red+Nom:timaadaa          Clitics/NG ;    !   timaadaa
     +1Pl+Red+Nom:nimaadaa          Clitics/NG ;    !   nimaadnaa
    +2Pl+Red+Nom:yimaadaa           Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaadaa
    +3Pl+Red+Nom:yimaadaa           Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaadaa


LEXICON IMAN/GenPresRedAbs
      +1Sg+Red+Abs:imaadda´         Clitics ;   !    imaadda´
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:yimaadda´         Clitics ;   !   yimaadda´
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:yimaadda´         Clitics ;   !   yimaadda´
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:timaadda´         Clitics ;   !   timaadda´
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:nimaadda´         Clitics ;   !   nimaadna´
    +2Pl+Red+Abs:yimaadda´          Clitics ;   !   yimaadda´
    +3Pl+Red+Abs:yimaadda´          Clitics ;   !   yimaadda´

    ! NOTE: NG forms without geminate
      +1Sg+Red+Abs:imaada´          Clitics/NG ;    !    imaada´
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:yimaada´          Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaada´
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:yimaada´          Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaada´
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:timaada´          Clitics/NG ;    !   timaada´
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:nimaada´          Clitics/NG ;    !   nimaadna´
    +2Pl+Red+Abs:yimaada´           Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaada´
    +3Pl+Red+Abs:yimaada´           Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaada´

LEXICON IMAN/GenPresRel
      +1Sg+Rel:imaaddo´         Clitics ;   !    imaaddo´
     +2Sg+Rel:yimaaddo´         Clitics ;   !   yimaaddo´
    +3SgM+Rel:yimaaddo´         Clitics ;   !   yimaaddo´
    +3SgF+Rel:timaaddo´         Clitics ;   !   timaaddo´
     +1Pl+Rel:nimaaddo´         Clitics ;   !   nimaadno´
    +2Pl+Rel:yimaaddaan´´           Clitics ;   !   yimaaddaan´´
    +3Pl+Rel:yimaaddaan´´           Clitics ;   !   yimaaddaan´´

    ! NOTE: NG forms without geminate
      +1Sg+Rel:imaado´          Clitics/NG ;    !    imaado´
     +2Sg+Rel:yimaado´          Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaado´
    +3SgM+Rel:yimaado´          Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaado´
    +3SgF+Rel:timaado´          Clitics/NG ;    !   timaado´
     +1Pl+Rel:nimaado´          Clitics/NG ;    !   nimaadno´
    +2Pl+Rel:yimaadaan´´            Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaadaan´´
    +3Pl+Rel:yimaadaan´´            Clitics/NG ;    !   yimaadaan´´



LEXICON IMAN/GenPresNeg
      +1Sg:imaaddo´         Clitics ;     !  imaaddo´
     +2Sg:timaaddo´         Clitics ;     ! timaaddo´
    +3SgM:yimaaddo´         Clitics ;     ! yimaaddo´
    +3SgF:timaaddo´         Clitics ;     ! timaaddo´
     +1Pl:nimaaddo´         Clitics ;     ! nimaadno´
    +2Pl:timaaddaan´    Clitics ;     ! timaadda´an
    +3Pl:yimaaddaan´    Clitics ;     ! yimaadda´an

LEXICON IMAN/Imp
    +Sg:kaalay      Clitics ;       ! kaa´lay
    +Pl:kaalaya     Clitics ;   ! kaala´ya

    +Neg+Sg:iman    Clitics ;     ! i´man
    +Neg+Sg:imanin  Clitics ;     ! i´manin
    +Neg+Pl:imani´na Clitics ;  ! imani´na

LEXICON IMAN/ALT
    +Sty/TODO:d´        Clitics ;
    :´                  Clitics ;



! TODO: odhan needs alternate -r- forms with +Sty/TODO

LEXICON ODHAN
    +Inf:odhan  Clitics ; ! odha´n
    +Inf:oran   FINAL/TODO ; ! odha´n

    +Ind+Past:  ODHAN/GenPast ;
    +Ind+Past:  ODHAN/GenPastRedAbs ; ! +Red tag after
    +Neg+Past:  ODHAN/GenPastNeg ;
    +Ind+Pres:  ODHAN/GenPresRel ; ! +Rel tag after

    +Ind+Pres:  ODHAN/GenPres ;
    +Ind+Pres:  ODHAN/GenPresRedAbs ; ! +Red tag after
    +Ind+Pres:  ODHAN/GenPresRedNom ;
    +Ind+Past:  ODHAN/GenPastRedAbs ;
    +Ind+Past:  ODHAN/GenPastRedNom ;
    +Neg+Pres:  ODHAN/GenPresNeg ;

    +Imp:       ODHAN/Imp ;

    ! Barrier and  necessary for Prog.
     :odhan%>       Progressive ; ! ima´n ; TODO: +Ind tag comes in at some odd place.
    +Sty/TODO:oran%>        Progressive ; ! ima´n ; TODO: +Ind tag comes in at some odd place.

    +Neg+Prog+Pres:odhan            Clitics ;       ! odha´n
    +Neg+Prog+Past:odhanayn         Clitics ;   ! odha´nay´n
    +Neg+Prog+Past:odhanaynin       Clitics ;   ! odha´nayni´n

    +Neg+Prog+Pres:oran             Clitics ;       ! odha´n
    +Neg+Prog+Past:oranayn          Clitics ;   ! odha´nay´n
    +Neg+Prog+Past:oranaynin        Clitics ;   ! odha´nayni´n



LEXICON ODHAN/GenPast
     +1Sg:0%<idhi             Clitics ;
     +2Sg:t%<idhi             Clitics ;
    +3SgM:y%<idhi             Clitics ;
    +3SgF:t%<idhi             Clitics ;
     +1Pl:n%<idhi             Clitics ;
     +2Pl:t%<idhaahdeen        Clitics ;
     +3Pl:y%<idhaahdeen        Clitics ;
    ! Forms for southern dialect. Doing this the lazy copy/paste way.
    ! People actually write these, so analyzing them with a Sty tag.
     +1Sg:0%<iri              STY/R ;
     +2Sg:t%<iri              STY/R ;
    +3SgM:y%<iri              STY/R ;
    +3SgF:t%<iri              STY/R ;
     +1Pl:n%<iri              STY/R ;
     +2Pl:t%<iraahdeen     STY/R ;
     +3Pl:y%<iraahdeen     STY/R ;
